Illinois, session 104th, SB350.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Natural Areas Stewardship Act is 5amended by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (525 ILCS 31/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Illinois Natural Areas Stewardship Act.9(Source: P.A. 100-420, eff. 8-25-17.)